California statutes. Education Code
 status report plus the allowance calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) for the prior two years’ local control funding formula assistance status reports, divided by three.

(b) The allowance for each fiscal year shall be equal to the sum of the following: one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) multiplied by the number of small school districts; two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) multiplied by the number of medium school districts; and three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) multiplied by the number of large school districts for which the county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction pursuant to Sections 1240 and 1253 that are also determined to be in need of differentiated assistance pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 52071.

(c) For purposes of this section, a small school district is any school district with average daily attendance of 2,499 or less, a medium
 school district is any school district with an average daily attendance of at least 2,500 but not more than 9,999, and a large school district is any school district with an average daily attendance of 10,000 or more.

(d) Average daily attendance for purposes of this section shall be the annual period average daily attendance as reported by the school district for the prior fiscal year.

(e) For purposes of this section, a school district in need of differentiated assistance is a school district identified pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 52071.

(f) For a county superintendent of schools in a county where the county board of education serves as the governing board of any school district under its jurisdiction, and the school district is identified for differentiated assistance pursuant to subdivision (c) of
 Section 52071, the amount calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be allocated to the lead agency identified pursuant to Section 52073 of the region in which the county office of education is located. Funds allocated pursuant to this subdivision shall be used by either the lead agency to whom the funds were allocated or another county office of education identified by the county office of education that generated the funds to provide the technical assistance described in subdivision (c) of Section 52071 to the county office of education that generated the funds.

(g) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations described in subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202.

(h) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 3.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2575.3.

(a) Commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall add to the amounts to be apportioned pursuant to Section 2575, the amount calculated in accordance with the following:

(1) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, the fiscal year allowance calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) using the 2022 local control funding formula assistance status report.

(2) For the 2023–24 fiscal year, the fiscal year allowance calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) using the 2023 local control funding formula assistance status report plus the allowance calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) using the 2022 local control funding formula assistance status report, divided by two.

(3) For the 2024–25
 and 2025–26 fiscal years, the allowance calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) for the current year local control funding formula assistance status report plus the allowance calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) for the prior two years’ local control funding formula assistance status reports, divided by three.

(b) The allowance for each fiscal year shall be equal to the product of the following: one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) multiplied by the number of charter schools in the county in which the charter school is located, or for charter schools authorized by the county board of education, the lead agency identified pursuant to Section 52073 for that county, that are also determined to be in need of differentiated assistance pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 47607.3.

(c) For purposes of this section, a charter school in need
 of differentiated assistance is a charter school identified pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 47607.3.

(d) Funds allocated pursuant to this section shall be used to provide the technical assistance described in subdivision (a) of Section 47607.3 to the charter school that generated the funds.

(e) Nothing in this section shall preclude a lead agency identified pursuant to Section 52073 that receives funding pursuant to subdivision (b) from contracting with a designee, as identified in subdivision (d) of Section 52071, to provide the technical assistance described in subdivision (a) of Section 47607.3 to the charter school that generated the funds.

(f) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations described in subdivision (a) shall
 be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 4.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2575.35.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Community schools” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 8901.

(2) “Universal and targeted assistance county office of education funding” means funding allocated under this section to a county office of education to support all local educational agencies within the county’s jurisdiction.

(b) (1) Funds allocated pursuant to this section shall be used to provide universal and targeted assistance, free of cost, to support the continuous improvement of all local educational agencies located within the
 county to improve outcomes under the state priorities identified in subdivision (d) of Section 52060 and subdivision (d) of Section 52066.

(2) The requirement that services be provided free of cost pursuant to this section applies only to services funded with moneys allocated under this section. This section does not prohibit a county superintendent of schools from entering into agreements with local educational agencies for a fee, provided that those services are (A) not supported with funds allocated pursuant to this section and (B), if the receiving local educational agency is located within the county offering the service, the service is supplemental to those offered in that county pursuant to this section.

(c) (1) Allowable uses for universal and targeted assistance include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(A) (i) The county superintendent of schools providing targeted technical assistance pursuant to Sections 47607.3 and 52071.

(ii) The county superintendent of schools providing technical assistance related to data management processes pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 52071.1.

(iii) For a school district or county office of education that operates within a county in which there is only one school district, including the Counties of Alpine, Amador, Del Norte, Mariposa, Plumas, and Sierra, and the City and County of San Francisco, and the school district is identified for differentiated assistance pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 52071, the lead agency identified pursuant to Section 52073 of the region in which the county office of education is located, or another county office of
 education identified by the county office of education that generated the funds, shall provide the technical assistance described in subdivision (c) of Section 52071 to the county office of education that generated the funds.

(iv) For charter schools authorized by the county board of education that are also determined to be in need of technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 47607.3, the lead agency identified pursuant to Section 52073 for that county shall provide the technical assistance described in subdivision (a) of Section 47607.3 to the charter school in need of assistance. Nothing in this section shall preclude a lead agency identified pursuant to Section 52073 that receives funding pursuant to this section from contracting with a designee, as identified in subdivision (d) of Section 52071, to provide the technical assistance described in subdivision (a) of Section 47607.3 to the charter school in need of
 assistance.

(B) Providing support and professional development to local educational agencies on improving pupil performance and closing achievement gaps for pupil subgroups identified pursuant to Section 52052.

(C) Providing support to local educational agencies in evaluating their annual performance on the state and local indicators, including their locally collected and reported data for the local indicators, that are included in the California School Dashboard authorized in Section 52064.5.

(D) Providing effective assistance and coaching to local educational agencies on the development and implementation of the local control and accountability plan and the annual update to the local control and accountability plan, including assistance related to monitoring the impact of the implementation of local control and
 accountability plan goals pursuant to Section 52064.

(E) Coordinating and connecting local educational agencies with universal resources available through the statewide system of support, authorized pursuant to Section 52059.5, and community schools technical assistance pursuant to Section 8902 to support community schools implementation in their county.

(F) Providing support and assistance pursuant to subparagraphs (B) to (E), inclusive, in a manner that prioritizes local educational agencies identified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 52064.5.

(2) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, county offices of education shall spend the funds allocated pursuant to this section in a manner that prioritizes support of school districts identified for technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (c) or (f) of
 Section 52071 on the 2025 California School Dashboard.

(3) County offices of education shall ensure local educational agencies identified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 52064.5 are informed of the universal assistance available pursuant to this section. County offices of education shall spend the funds allocated pursuant to this section in a manner that prioritizes the identified local educational agencies for support.

(d) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, the department annually shall add to the amounts to be apportioned pursuant to Section 2575 a universal and targeted assistance county office of education funding grant equal to the sum of each of the following amounts:

(1) (A) For the 2026–27 fiscal year only, five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(B) Commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the amount calculated pursuant to this paragraph for the prior fiscal year shall be adjusted by the percentage change applied pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 2574 for the current fiscal year.

(2) A county office of education average daily attendance grant that shall be calculated by multiplying each county office of education’s funding allocation pursuant to paragraphs (3),(4), and (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 2574 in the prior fiscal year by 0.1512.

(3) A stability grant for each county office of education calculated in accordance with the following:

(A) For the 2026–27 fiscal year only, subtract the sum of paragraphs (1) and (2) for the county
 office of education from the amount allocated pursuant to Sections 2575.2 and 2575.3 to the county office of education for the 2025–26 fiscal year. If the result is positive, that result is the stability grant amount. If the result is negative, no stability grant shall be added.

(B) Commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, subtract the sum of paragraphs (1) and (2) for the county office of education from the prior fiscal year universal and targeted assistance county office of education funding grant for the county office of education. If the result is positive, multiply the result by 0.87 to determine the stability grant amount. If the result is negative, no stability grant shall be added.

(e) For a school district or county office of education that operates within a city or county in which there is a single school district, including the
 Counties of Alpine, Amador, Del Norte, Mariposa, Plumas, and Sierra, and the City and County of San Francisco, the amounts calculated pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (d) shall be allocated to the lead agency identified pursuant to Section 52073 of the region in which the county office of education is located.

(f) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations described in subdivision (d) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 5.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2575.4.

Commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall adjust the county local control funding formula calculation as follows:

(a) Determine the amount of the county local control funding formula attributed to the annual inflation adjustment for each fiscal year as the sum of the following:

(1) That portion of the county office of education operations grant, authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2574, which is attributed to the rate change pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 2574.

(2) That portion of the
 alternative education grant, authorized pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2574, which is attributed to the rate change pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 2574.

(b) Add the amount calculated in subdivision (a) to the base entitlement for the transition to the county local control funding formula determined pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2575.

(c) Add the amount calculated in subdivision (a) to the amount of the minimum guarantee determined pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 2575, unless the amount of local revenue calculated pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2575 exceeds the county local control funding formula entitlement calculated pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2574 or subdivision (a) of Section 2575, as determined by subdivision (g) of Section 2575, in which case the add-on amount
 shall be zero.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 571, Sec. 1.   (AB 185)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2575.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (b) be included in the local control and accountability plan template pursuant to Section 52064.

(b) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall allocate a Student Support and Enrichment Block Grant for each county office of education, in the amount of three thousand dollars ($3,000) per unit of alternative education grant average daily attendance, determined pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 2574, to be used for the following student support and enrichment opportunity purposes:

(1) Expanding access to A–G
 courses.

(2) Dual enrollment partnerships.

(3) Elective and world language courses.

(4) Vocational and career technical education.

(5) Preparation for and application for admission into institutions of higher education.

(6) College and career counseling.

(7) Transition counseling.

(8) Mental health support services.

(9) Certificated or classified employees who provide services to achieve the objectives of this paragraph.

(10) High
 school completion, including access to high school equivalency examinations.

(11) For purposes of implementing Sections 858 and 889.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 4.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2576.

(a) If a county superintendent of schools enrolls in a school operated by the county superintendent of schools a pupil not funded pursuant to clause (i), (ii), or (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 2574, or Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 48645) of Chapter 4 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2, any attendance generated by that pupil shall be credited to the school district of residence. Notwithstanding Section 42238.05, funding generated by this average daily attendance shall be allocated based on average daily attendance reported in the current year in accordance with Section 41601. Enrollment of these pupils shall be transferred to the school district of residence for purposes of calculating the percentage of unduplicated pupils pursuant to Section 42238.02.

(b) For purposes of this section, the school district of residence for a homeless child or youth, as defined in Section 11434a(2) of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.), enrolled in a school operated by a county superintendent of schools shall be deemed to be the school district that last provided educational services to the homeless child or youth or, if it is not possible to determine that school district, the nonbasic aid school district with the largest average daily attendance in the county that serves the grade level in which the homeless child or youth would be enrolled.

(c) If a county superintendent of schools grants permission to a pupil to attend school in an adjoining state pursuant to Section 2000, attendance generated by that pupil shall be credited to the school district of residence.

(d) Commencing with the 2019–20 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall transfer to the county, wherein a pupil is enrolled, the amount calculated for the school district of residence pursuant to subdivisions (d) to (f), inclusive, of Section 42238.02 for each unit of average daily attendance credited to the school district of residence pursuant to this section. The Superintendent may transfer an alternative amount for each unit of average daily attendance credited to the school district of residence pursuant to this section, if the school district of residence and the county superintendent of schools agree to the alternative amount and report it to the Superintendent under procedures and timeframes established by the Superintendent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 5.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2577.

Notwithstanding any other law, revenue limit funding for county superintendents of schools for the 2012–13 fiscal year and prior fiscal years shall continue to be adjusted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 2550) of Chapter 12, as that article read on January 1, 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 53.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2578.

(a) Every fiscal year the Superintendent shall determine the amount of funds that will be restricted for each county superintendent of schools pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (g) of Section 2575, as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year.

(b) The auditor-controller of each county shall distribute the amounts determined in subdivision (a) to the Supplemental Revenue Augmentation Fund created within the county pursuant to Section 100.06 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The amount of funds required to be transferred by this subdivision shall be transferred annually in two equal shares with the first share transferred on or before January 15 of each year and the second share transferred after January 15 and on or before May 1 of
 each year.

(c) The funds transferred to the Supplemental Revenue Augmentation Fund pursuant to this section shall be transferred by the county office of education to the Controller in amounts determined by the Director of Finance, and shall be exclusively used to offset state costs of providing trial court services and costs, until the funds are exhausted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 33, Sec. 12.   (SB 859)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2579.

Commencing on July 1, 2013, all of the following shall apply:

(a) All references to Section 2558 shall instead refer to Section 2575.

(b) Unless the context otherwise requires, all references to the revenue limit of a county office of education or county superintendent of schools shall instead refer to the county local control funding formula.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   (AB 97)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2580.

(a) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of eight hundred ninety thousand dollars ($890,000) is hereby appropriated each fiscal year from the General Fund to the State Department of Education for allocation to the Los Angeles County Office of Education to maintain the curriculum-embedded performance tasks for science statewide repository developed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 113 of Chapter 38 of the Statutes of 2024, including all of the following:

(1) Creation and integration of new performance tasks to keep the repository replenished with innovative items to support inquiry-based science instruction and the Next Generation Science standards.

(2) Educator engagement through an educator review panel.

(3) Educator capacity building through engagement with professional development programs, including, to the extent practicable, professional development provided by the entities awarded funding pursuant to Section 53 of Chapter 571 of the Statutes of 2022.

(b) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which they are appropriated, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e)
 of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which they are appropriated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 6.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2581.

(a) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the sum of three million one hundred thousand dollars ($3,100,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the State Department of Education for the purpose set forth in subdivision (b).

(b) The State Department of Education shall allocate the funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) to the Kern County superintendent of schools Superintendent of Schools for the Kern County Office of Education and the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team for the Standardized Account Code Structure system replacement project.

(c) (1) For the 2022–23 fiscal year to the 2025–26 fiscal year, inclusive, the sum
 of three million nine hundred twenty thousand dollars ($3,920,000) shall be continuously appropriated each fiscal year, without regard to fiscal years, from the General Fund to the State Department of Education for the purposes set forth in subdivision (d).

(2) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of four million one hundred forty thousand dollars ($4,140,000) shall be continuously appropriated each fiscal year, without regard to fiscal years, from the General Fund to the State Department of Education for the purposes set forth in subdivision (d).

(d) The State Department of Education shall allocate the funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (c) to the Kern County Superintendent of Schools for the Kern County Office of Education and the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team for maintenance and operations support for the Standardized Account
 Code Structure system.

(e) (1) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2021–22 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2021–22 fiscal year.

(2) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (c) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in
 subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which they are appropriated, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which they are appropriated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 7.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2582.

(a) The sum of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the department for allocation to the Kern County Superintendent of Schools to augment the Mathematics Professional Learning Partnership, established by Section 114 of Chapter 38 of the Statutes of 2024 and augmented by Section 95 of Chapter 8 of the Statutes of 2025, to further support educator training, including mathematics coaches, teachers, and school administrators for implementation of the new mathematics curriculum framework in local educational agencies. These funds shall be available for encumbrance through June 30, 2031.

(1) The Mathematics
 Professional Learning Partnership shall continue to support the California Mathematics Project along with its other existing partners and shall expand upon collaborations with the Rural Math Collaborative to provide training in and support mathematics coaching in local educational agencies in rural areas. These support providers shall also train coaches who can be deployed to provide mathematics coaching in schools and local educational agencies with the highest need of support.

(2) The Kern County Superintendent of Schools shall use these funds to build upon the expenditure plan submitted to the Department of Finance pursuant to Section 95 of Chapter 8 of the Statutes of 2025 and shall submit a revised expenditure plan to the Department of Finance for approval by December
 1, 2026.

(b) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 2.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2583.

(a) For the 2015–16 fiscal year to the 2022–23 fiscal year, inclusive, the Superintendent shall add two million dollars ($2,000,000) to the amount to be apportioned pursuant to Sections 2574 and 2575 for the Los Angeles County Office of Education for the purpose of supporting professional development and leadership training for education professionals related to antibias education and the creation of inclusive and equitable schools.

(b) For the 2023–24 fiscal year to the 2025–26 fiscal year, inclusive, the Superintendent shall add three million dollars ($3,000,000) to the amount to be apportioned pursuant to Sections 2574 and 2575 for the Los Angeles County Office of Education for the purpose of supporting statewide professional development
 and leadership training for education professionals related to antibias education and the creation of inclusive and equitable schools.

(c) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, the department shall add four million dollars ($4,000,000) to the amount to be apportioned pursuant to Sections 2574 and 2575 for the Los Angeles County Office of Education for allocation to the Museum of Tolerance for the purpose of supporting statewide professional development and leadership training for education professionals related to antibias education and the creation of inclusive and equitable schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 9.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. School District Boundaries [2600. - 2603.]

2600.

Every county superintendent shall inquire and ascertain whether the boundaries of the school districts and community college districts in his county are definitely and plainly described in the records of the board of supervisors and keep in his office a full and correct transcript of the boundaries.

If the boundaries of districts are conflicting or incorrectly described, or if, by reason of the resubdivision of land or other change of property lines, the location of the boundaries becomes indefinite or conflicts with lines of assessment, the board of supervisors may correct and relocate the boundaries to follow definite, established property lines, conforming as nearly as practicable to the general location of the former boundaries.

Where boundary lines are corrected or relocated, the relocation of the new lines shall be made in such a manner that the majority of the area of the parcel or property affected determines the district in which the parcel or property is located. Nothing herein contained authorizes the board of supervisors, in relocating the boundaries, to substantially alter the former boundaries of school districts, or community college districts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

2601.

Whenever the boundary line of any school district or community college district is described as being “to” or “from” the ocean shore, such description means to or from a point three miles seaward from the shore.

Whenever the boundary line of any school district or community college district is described as being “along,” “with,” “by,” or “on” the ocean shore, such description means on a line parallel with and three miles seaward from the shore.

Nothing contained in this section shall retroactively alter, enlarge, diminish or otherwise affect the powers, jurisdiction, rights, duties, responsibilities, obligations or liabilities of any such school district or community college district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

2602.

Whenever any school district or community college district has been or is hereafter intersected by any county boundary line in the formation of any new county, or in changing the boundary of any county, and portions of the district then lie in different counties, the district shall, by operation of law, constitute and become established as a joint school district, at the time of the intersection, unless otherwise provided.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

2603.

The county superintendent may, if he deems it necessary, order a description of the boundaries of any district under his jurisdiction printed in pamphlet form and pay for the pamphlets out of the county school service fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 3. COUNTY ADMINISTRATION OF DISTRICT ORGANIZATION [4000. - 4024.]



  CHAPTER 1. Operational Procedures [4000. - 4024.]



  ARTICLE 1. County Committees on School District Organization [4000. - 4014.]

4000.

There is in each county, except a county which is also a city and county, a county committee on school district organization. The number of members of the county committee in each county shall be determined as provided in this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 3.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

4001.

If all of the territory of a county under the jurisdiction of the county superintendent of schools of the county is included in one unified school district, the governing board of the unified school district shall constitute the county committee.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 3.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

4002.

Except as provided in Section 4001, if there are fewer than six school districts or community college districts in the territory under the jurisdiction of the county superintendent of schools of the county, he or she shall determine the number of, and appoint, the members of the county committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

4003.

In every county with six or more school districts or community college districts in the territory under the jurisdiction of the county superintendent of schools of the county, the county committee on school district organization shall have 11 members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

4004.

(a) If the number of school districts or community college districts in a county with six or more districts decreases to fewer than six, Section 4001 or 4002 shall apply, as appropriate.

(b) If the number of school districts or community college districts in a county with fewer than six districts increases to six or more, Section 4003 shall apply.

(c) Each member serving on a county committee when the number of school districts or community college districts changes as described in subdivision (a) or (b) shall serve out his or her term of office.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 3.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

4005.

(a) The county superintendent of schools shall call an annual meeting of the representatives of the governing board of each school district, elected pursuant to Section 35023, and the representatives of the governing board of each community college district, elected pursuant to Section 72403. This annual meeting shall be held between October 1 and December 1.

(b) The county superintendent of schools shall give notice of the annual meeting to the representatives of each governing board by prepaid mail addressed to the clerk or secretary of the governing board of each district. The notice shall be deemed sufficient and complete when deposited in the United States mail.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 3.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

4006.

(a) Any vacancy created by the expiration of the term of office of a member of the county committee on school district organization shall be filled by the majority vote of the representatives of the governing boards at the annual meeting called and held pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4005. The county committee may authorize the representatives of the governing boards to vote, for this purpose, through the use of absentee ballots that are submitted, in the form and manner prescribed by the county committee, prior to the date set for the annual meeting.

(b) If the representatives fail to elect members to fill the vacancies on the county committee pursuant to subdivision (a), the vacancies shall be filled by the county superintendent of schools.

(c) Vacancies on the county committee which occur prior to the expiration of the term of office of a member of the county committee, which are caused by the happening of any of the events specified in Section 1770 of the Government Code, shall be filled as follows:

(1) In a county in which the members of the county committee are appointed by the county superintendent of schools, by the appointment of the county superintendent of schools.

(2) In a county in which the members of the county committee are elected by the representatives of the governing boards, by the majority vote of the remaining members of the committee. However, if the remaining members of the committee do not fill the vacancy within 70 days of its occurrence, the county superintendent of schools shall fill the vacancy by his or her appointment.

Persons elected or appointed to fill a vacancy pursuant to this subdivision shall hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the allowance for absentee ballots will increase participation in the selection of county committees and will not diminish the public review of candidates for those county committees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 860, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4007.

No county superintendent of schools, employee of the office of a county superintendent of schools, employee of a school district, or employee of a community college district shall be a member of the county committee. Any member of the governing board of a school district or community college district in the same or any other county who is otherwise eligible may simultaneously serve as a member of the county committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1123, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4008.

(a) At least two members of every county committee shall be elected from among the registered voters residing within each county supervisorial district in the county. 

(b) If any change in the boundaries of a county supervisorial district in the county affects an incumbent member of the county committee, the affected member shall serve the remainder of his or her term of office and succeeding county committees shall be elected in accordance with subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 581, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4009.

The term of each member of the county committee shall begin upon election pursuant to Section 4006 or upon appointment pursuant to Section 4002, as appropriate, and shall be for four years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 3.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

4010.

The members of the county committee shall serve without compensation. However, they shall receive reimbursement for any actual and necessary travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

4011.

(a) The county counsel, or if there is no county counsel, the district attorney, may provide legal services to the county committee.
